Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2
SCOPE OF ARTICLE

5-10-201. Application.

This article shall apply to a rental purchase agreement, or acts, practices, or conduct relating to a rental purchase agreement if:

The rental purchase agreement is entered into in this state; or

The lessee is a resident of this state at the time the lessor offering the rental purchase agreement solicits the rental purchase agreement or modification thereof, whether such solicitation is made personally, by mail, or by telephone.

For the purposes of this article, the residence of the lessee is the address given by the lessee as the lessee's residence in any writing signed by the lessee in connection with the rental purchase agreement. Unless the lessee notifies the lessor in writing of a new or different residence address, the given residence address is presumed to be unchanged.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 367, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-202. Exclusions.

This article shall not apply to, and an agreement that complies with this article is not governed by the provision relating to:

A "consumer credit sale" as that term is defined in section 5-1-301 (11);

A "consumer lease" as that term is defined in section 5-1-301 (14);

A "consumer loan" as that term is defined in section 5-1-301 (15);

Repealed.

A "home solicitation sale" as that term is defined in section 5-3-401;

A "sale of goods" as that term is defined in section 5-1-301 (39);

A "security interest" as that term is defined in section 4-1-201 (b)(35), C.R.S.;

Any lease for agricultural, business, or commercial purposes;

Any lease of money or intangible personal property.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 367, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

L. 96:

(1)(d) and (1)(e) repealed, p. 407, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(f), and (1)(g) amended, p. 1870, § 101, effective August 2.

L. 2006:

(1)(h) amended, p. 503, § 45, effective September 1.